Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1429.04
Controlled substance or counterfeit substance; sales prohibited; violation; penalty.

A person holding a license under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 who sells, gives, or furnishes in any way to any consumer in this state, or who willingly allows to be taken from such licensee's place of business by any person, any controlled substance or counterfeit substance, as such terms are defined in section 28-401, shall be, in addition to the penalties provided for in the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, subject to the additional penalty of revocation and forfeiture of such license as provided in sections 28-1425 and 28-1429 at the discretion of the court.

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 15.

Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see section 28-401.01.